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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−15

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
S UsingSST09843 −18020,connect the terminalsTcandE

1
ofcheckconnector.

S If anyabnormality isnot foundwhen inspectingparts, inspect theECU.
S If amalfunctioncode isdisplayedduring theDTCcheck,check thecircuit listed thatcode.Fordetails

of each code, turn to the page referred to under the ”See page” for respective ”DTC No.” in the DTC
chart.

DTC chart of ABS:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C0278 / 11
(DI−35)

Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
SABSsolenoid rela y

C0279 / 12
(DI−35)

B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit

SABS solenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0226 /21
(DI−32)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRRorSFRHcircuit

C0236 /22
(DI−32)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLRorSFLHcircuit

C0246 /23
(DI−32)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRRRorSRRHcircuit

C0256 /24
(DI−32)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRLRorSRLHcircuit

C1225 /25
(DI−54)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA1circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1circuit

C1226 /26
(DI−54)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA2circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

C1227 /27
(DI−54)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakebooster
solenoidcircuit (SA3circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA3circuit

C1228 /28
(DI−54)

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(STRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSTRcircuit

C0200 /31*
1

(DI−25)
Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C0205 /32*
1

(DI−25)
Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor

E h d i i t
C0210 /33*

1

(DI−25)
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0215 /34*
1

(DI−25)
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C1237 / 37
(DI−66)

Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size

C1241 / 41
(DI−67)

Lowbatteryvoltageorabnormallyhighbatteryvoltage
SBattery
S IC regulator

SPowersourcecircuit

C1242 /42*
2

(DI−71)
Open circuit in IG2 circuit

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

C1243 / 43
(DI−75)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output)
SDecelerationsensor
SWire harness for deceleration sensor system
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C1244 / 44
(DI−77)

Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1245 / 45
(DI−75)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1246 / 46
(DI−79)

Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor
SMastercylinderpressuresensor
SMastercylinderpressuresensorcircuit

C1249 / 49
(DI−82)

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit

C1251 /51*
2

(DI−87)
Pumpmotor is locked
Opencircuit inpumpmotorground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1252 /52*
2

(DI−90)
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor
SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotorcircuit
SPressureswitch (PHorPL)

C1253 /53*
2

(DI−96)
Hydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor relaymalfunction

SABSmotor1orABSmotor2 relay
SABSmotor1orABSmotor2 relaycircuit

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotorcircuit

C1254 /54*
2

(DI−101)
Pressure switch malfunction

SPressureswitch (PHorPL)
SPressureswitchcircuit

C1256 /56*
2

(DI−104)
Accumulator low pressure malfunction

SAccumulator
SPressureswitch (PHorPL)
SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor

C1257 /57*
2

(DI−11 0 )
Power supply drive circuit malfunction

SBattery
SPowersourcecircuit
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

C1268 / 68
(DI−11 4 )

Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure
STransferL4positionswitch
STransferL4positionswitchcircuit

C1269 / 69
(DI−11 7 )

Malfunction in neutral start switch circuit (R range)
SNeutral start switch
SNeutral start switchcircuit (R range)

Always ON
(DI−126)

Malfunction in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

*
1
:As theDTCcannotbeerasedby replacingpartsalonedoeitherof the followingoperations.

(1) Clear DTC (See page DI−4) .
(2) At the vehicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. or more.



ECU

Powersource*

Hydraulicbrakebooster

Motor relay circuit

Accumulator malfunction

Pumpmotorcircuit

Pressureswitch PH

PL

Pump motor

MTTwireharness

MT+ wire harness
MT− wireharness

MR1 open circuit

MR2 open circuit

MR1 welded contact

MR2 welded contact

Pressure leaks

IG2opencircuit
Power supply circuit

Light Buzzer Light Light Light Light Light LightBuzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer

DTC

BRAKEwarning lightandbuzzer

42 51 52 53 54 56 57

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

*
2
:Using the following table, troubledpartscanbespecified.
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DTC chart of VSC:

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C1231 / 31
(DI−56)

Malfunction in steering angle sensor
SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit

C1232 / 32
(DI−60)

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1233 / 33
(DI−62)

Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1234 / 34
(DI−62)

Malfunction in yaw rate sensor
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit

C1210 / 36
(DI−120)

Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone
SYawratesensor
SYawratesensorcircuit
SNeutral start switchcircuit (P range)

C1207 / 37
(DI−44)

Malfunction in neutral start switch (P/R range)
SNeutral start switch
SNeutral start switchcircuit (P/Rrange)

C1336 / 39
(DI−120)

Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit
SNeutral start switch (P range)circuit

C1223 / 43
(DI−50)

Malfunction in ABS control system ABS control system

C1224 / 44
(DI−51)

Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit
SNEOcircuit
SEngineandECTECU
SABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

C1340 / 47
(DI−123)

Open circuit in center differential lock signal
SCenterdifferential locksystem
SCenterdifferential lockcircuit

C1201 / 51
(DI−41)

Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system

C1203 / 53
(DI−42)

EngineandECTECUcommunicationcircuitmalfunction
STRC+orTRC − circuit
SENG+orENG − circuit

SEngineandECTECU

AlwaysON
(DI−130)

Malfunction inABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
Opencircuit inVSCTRCwarning lightcircuit

SPowersourcecircuit
SVSCTRCwarning lightcircuit

HINT:
There isacase thathand −held testercannotbeusedwhenVSCTRCwarning light isalwayson.


